src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/dicttests_dict-gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# Tag tests:
  v1-v2 - elkie:
    aalkoe+v1+N+Sg+Gen: aalkoen
    aalkoe+v2+N+Sg+Gen: aalkoven
    aalkoe+N+v2+Sg+Gen: ~aalkoven

  v3-v4 - dåakterekontovre:
    dåakterekontovre+v3+N+Sg+Gen: [dåkterekontovren, dåktere-kontovren]
    dåakterekontovre+v4+N+Sg+Gen: [dakterekontovren, daktere-kontovren]
    dåakterekontovre+N+v4+Sg+Gen: ~dakterekontovren

# Sem tags obligatory for Prop:
  Sem/Sur - Risten:
    Risten+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Ristenen

  Sem/Plc - Romsa:
    Romsa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Romsan

  Sem/Hum - ipmil: # No tag here:
    jupmele+N+Sg+Gen: jupmelen
